Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1453.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Food Desert Opportunity Zone Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Food desert." A low-income census tract where a substantial number or share of residents have low access to a healthy food retail outlet."Healthy food retail outlet." A supermarket or large grocery 20250HB1453PN1701 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 store."Low access to a healthy food retail outlet." The following:(1) More than one mile from a supermarket or large grocery store in urban areas.(2) More than 10 miles from a supermarket or large grocery store in rural areas."Low-income census tract." A census tract where:(1) the poverty rate for that tract is at least 20%;(2) for tracts not located within a metropolitan area, the median family income for the tract does not exceed 80% of Statewide median family income; or(3) for tracts located within a metropolitan area, the median family income for the tract does not exceed 80% of the greater of Statewide median family income or the metropolitan area median family income."Tax credit." A food desert opportunity tax credit under section 501."Zone." A food desert opportunity zone established under section 301(a).CHAPTER 3FOOD DESERT OPPORTUNITY ZONESSection 301. Food desert opportunity zones.(a) Establishment.--A program providing for food desert opportunity zones is established within the department.(b) Criteria for zone.--A zone shall be comprised of a low-income census tract where at least 33% of the tract's population or a minimum of 500 people in the tract have low access to a healthy food retail outlet.(c) Zone authorization.--The department shall authorize not more than 12 zones in this Commonwealth. Healthy food retail 20250HB1453PN1701 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 outlets within a zone that are qualified under this act shall be entitled to a tax credit for a period not to exceed five years beginning January 1, 2026, and ending on or before December 31, 2030.Section 302. Application.(a) Initial application.--One or more political subdivisions in a low-income census tract, or a designee of one or more political subdivisions, may apply to the department to designate the low-income census tract as a zone.(b) Participation limitation.--A political subdivision shall not be a part of more than one proposed zone, unless the department agrees that two zones will bring additional benefit to the residents of the political subdivision.(c) Application limitation.--A political subdivision may submit only one application to the department for the authorization of a zone.(d) Form and manner.--The application shall be in a form and manner as prescribed by the department.Section 303. Review.(a) Action of department.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall review all completed applications submitted under section 302. An application for authorization of a zone must be received by the department on or before September 30, 2025, in order to be considered by the department.(b) Process.--The department shall authorize up to 12 zones from applications meeting the criteria in section 301(b) based upon need and likelihood of success. The department may not alter the geographic boundaries of a zone.(c) Authorizations.--The department shall authorize all 20250HB1453PN1701 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 zones by November 30, 2025.(d) Effective date of designation.--The designation of a zone under this section shall take effect January 1, 2026.(e) Extension.--The department may extend the deadline for the receipt of applications for zones until December 31, 2025, if all 12 zones have not been authorized and the extension is necessary to allow eligible political subdivisions to apply. The department shall authorize additional zones under this subsection by February 28, 2026. The authorization shall take effect January 1, 2026, or if the authorization occurs after January 1, 2026, that subsequent authorization shall for all purposes be retroactive to January 1, 2026. The zone authorization shall end as provided in section 301(c).Section 304. Qualified healthy food retail outlet.(a) Qualifications.--In order to qualify each year for a tax credit under Chapter 5, a healthy food retail outlet shall own or lease real property in a zone from which the healthy food retail outlet actively conducts business. The qualified healthy food retail outlet shall receive certification from the department that the healthy food retail outlet is located and is in the active conduct of business within the zone. The healthy food retail outlet shall obtain annual renewal of the certification from the department to continue to qualify under this section.(b) Relocation.--Any healthy food retail outlet that relocates from outside a zone shall not receive a tax credit provided under Chapter 5 unless the healthy food retail outlet does one of the following:(1) increases full-time employment by at least 20% in the first full year of operation within the zone;20250HB1453PN1701 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) makes a capital investment in the property located within the zone equivalent to at least 10% of the gross revenues of that healthy food retail outlet in the immediately preceding calendar or fiscal year; or(3) enters into a lease agreement for property located within the zone:(i) for a term equivalent to at least the duration of the zone; and(ii) with aggregate payment under the lease agreement equivalent to at least 5% of the gross revenues of that healthy food retail outlet in the immediately preceding calendar or fiscal year.(c) Waiver of requirements.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, may waive or modify the requirements under subsection (b), as appropriate.Section 305. Decertification.(a) Application.--One or more political subdivisions, or a designee of one or more political subdivisions, may apply to the department to decertify and remove the designation of a zone. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(b) Process.--The department may grant the request to decertify and remove the designation of a zone after completed applications have been submitted by all qualified political subdivisions in which the zone is located.CHAPTER 5TAX CREDITSection 501. Food desert opportunity tax credit.(a) Credits.--For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2026, a qualified healthy food retail outlet may apply to the 20250HB1453PN1701 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Revenue for a tax credit against the tax imposed by Article III of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, for the taxable year. The Department of Revenue shall prescribe the form and manner to obtain the tax credit.(b) Application of credit.--A qualified healthy food retail outlet shall apply for a tax credit by January 15 for the previous calendar year.(c) Apportionment.--The Department of Revenue shall apportion a tax credit for a qualified healthy food retail outlet that has not operated in a zone for a full fiscal year.(d) Tax credit determinations.--The tax credit shall be determined by multiplying the monthly average of all full-time jobs at a qualified healthy food retail outlet by the allowance. The allowance for purposes of the tax credit shall be $1,250 per job.(e) Notification of credit.--By March 15, the Department of Revenue shall notify a qualified healthy food retail outlet of the amount of the qualified healthy food retail outlet's tax credit approved.(f) Limitation on amount of credit.--The tax credit shall not exceed 50% of the tax liability of the qualified healthy food retail outlet under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the taxable year. A qualified healthy food retail outlet may not carry back or carry forward a tax credit received under this section.(g) Allocation.--The total amount of tax credits approved by the Department of Revenue shall not exceed $1,000,000 annually. If the tax credits exceed the $1,000,000 cap in a given year, the tax credits will be allocated on a pro rata basis.20250HB1453PN1701 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 502. Transferability.A tax credit awarded to a qualified healthy food retail outlet is nontransferable and cannot be applied, used or assigned to any other person, business or tax account.Section 503. Recapture.(a) Refund to Commonwealth.--If a qualified healthy food retail outlet located within a zone received a tax credit and subsequently relocates outside of the zone within the first five years of locating in the zone, the qualified healthy food retail outlet shall refund the Commonwealth in accordance with the following:(1) If the qualified healthy food retail outlet relocates within three years from the date of first locating in a zone, 66% of the tax credits awarded to the qualified healthy food retail outlet shall be refunded to the Commonwealth.(2) If the qualified healthy food retail outlet relocates within three to five years from the date of first locating in a zone, 33% of the tax credits awarded to the qualified healthy food retail outlet shall be refunded to the Commonwealth.(3) If the qualified healthy food retail outlet was located within a facility operated by a nonprofit organization to assist in the creation and development of a start-up business, no tax credit shall be refunded.(b) Waiver.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, may waive or modify recapture requirements under subsection (a) if the department determines that the relocation was due to circumstances beyond the control of the qualified healthy food retail outlet, including, but not 20250HB1453PN1701 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 limited to:(1) natural disaster;(2) unforeseen industry trends; or(3) loss of a major supplier or market.Section 504. Delinquent or deficient State or local taxes.(a) Compliance with tax laws.--(1) A qualified healthy food retail outlet may not claim or receive a tax credit unless the qualified healthy food retail outlet is in full compliance with all State and local tax laws, ordinances and resolutions.(2) A qualified healthy food retail outlet may not claim or receive a tax credit if any person or business with a 20% or greater interest in the qualified healthy food retail outlet is not in full compliance with all State and local tax laws, ordinances and resolutions.(b) Later compliance and eligibility.--A qualified healthy food retail outlet that is not eligible to claim a tax credit due to noncompliance with any State or local tax law may become eligible if the qualified healthy food retail outlet subsequently comes into full compliance with all State and local tax laws to the satisfaction of the Department of Revenue or the political subdivision within the calendar year in which the noncompliance first occurred. If full compliance is not attained by February 5 of the calendar year following the calendar year during which noncompliance first occurred, the qualified healthy food retail outlet is precluded from claiming a tax credit for that calendar year, whether or not full compliance is achieved subsequently.Section 505. Code compliance.(a) Compliance with tax laws.--A qualified healthy food 20250HB1453PN1701 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 retail outlet shall be precluded from claiming a tax credit if the qualified healthy food retail outlet owns real property in a zone and the real property is not in compliance with all applicable State and local zoning, building and housing laws, ordinances or codes.(b) Opportunity to achieve compliance.--A qualified healthy food retail outlet that is not in compliance under subsection (a) shall have until December 31 of the calendar year following designation of the real property as part of a zone, to be in compliance in order to claim a tax credit for that year. If full compliance is not attained by December 31 of that calendar year, the qualified healthy food retail outlet is precluded from claiming a tax credit for that calendar year, whether or not compliance is achieved in a subsequent calendar year. The Department of Revenue may extend the time period in which a qualified healthy food retail outlet must come into compliance with a local ordinance or building code for a period not to exceed one year if the Department of Revenue determines that the qualified healthy food retail outlet has made and shall continue to make a good faith effort to come into compliance and that an extension will enable the qualified healthy food retail outlet to achieve full compliance. Political subdivisions in a zone shall notify the Department of Revenue in writing of all qualified healthy food retail outlets not in compliance with this subsection within 30 days following the end of each calendar year.Section 506. Appeals.A qualified healthy food retail outlet shall be deemed to be in compliance with any State or local tax for purposes of this chapter if the qualified healthy food retail outlet has made a 20250HB1453PN1701 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 timely administrative or judicial appeal for that particular tax or has entered into and is in compliance with a duly authorized deferred payment plan with the Department of Revenue or political subdivision for that particular tax.Section 507. Notice requirements.(a) Requirement.--After compliance reviews have been conducted by appropriate Commonwealth and local authorities, the department shall notify each zone applicant by regular mail each year of the department's approval or denial of the zone application. No qualified healthy food retail outlet zone is entitled a tax credit unless the zone receives approval from the department.(b) Notice.--The department shall provide a one-time notification to every current zone real property owner by June 1, 2025. Failure to receive departmental notification under this section shall not extend or restrict any benefits or rights real property owners possess under this act.(c) Transmittal.--The department or its designated official shall, within 15 business days of receipt of a zone application made under this act, forward a copy of the application to appropriate Commonwealth and local authorities for review and processing.Section 508. Application time.(a) Deadline.--Except as provided under subsection (b), an applicant for a tax credit must file an application in a manner prescribed by the department by December 31 of each calendar year for which the applicant claims a tax.(b) Extension or waiver.--Upon request of the applicant, the department may extend or waive the application deadline for good cause shown.20250HB1453PN1701 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Approval.--A tax credit may not be claimed or received for that calendar year until approval has been granted by the department.CHAPTER 7MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 701. Illegal activity.Any funds or other forms of consideration received by a qualified healthy food retail outlet conducting any type of illegal activity shall not be eligible for a tax credit or any other benefits that are created under this act.Section 702. Rules and regulations.The department and the Department of Revenue may promulgate regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act.Section 703. Compliance.A qualified healthy food retail outlet eligible for a tax credit shall comply with all reporting, filing and compliance requirements under the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, unless otherwise provided for in this act.Section 704. Penalties.(a) Civil penalty.--(1) In addition to any penalties authorized by the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, for violations of that act, the Department of Revenue may impose an additional administrative penalty not to exceed $10,000 for any act or violation of this act, including the filing of any false statement, return or document.(2) The department may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for a violation of this act, including the 20250HB1453PN1701 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filing of any false statement, return or document.(b) Criminal penalty.--In addition to any criminal penalty under the Tax Reform Code of 1971, a qualified healthy food retail outlet that knowingly violates any of the provisions of this act commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 705. Construction.This act shall be interpreted to ensure that all provisions relating to tax credits are strictly construed in favor of the Commonwealth.Section 706. Applicability.The provisions of this act shall be applied prospectively. A qualified healthy food retail outlet may not claim a tax credit until the qualified healthy food retail outlet becomes qualified under this act.Section 707. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1453PN1701 - 13 - 12345678910111213141516